Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.180

Cooperation with other agencies or organizations.

(1) To encourage uniform application and interpretation of this chapter and securities and commodities regulation and enforcement in general, the director and the employees of the director may cooperate, including bearing the expense of the cooperation, with the securities agencies or administrators of another jurisdiction, Canadian provinces, or territories or such other agencies administering this chapter or similar statutes, the commodity futures trading commission, the federal securities and exchange commission, any self-regulatory organization established under the commodity exchange act or the securities exchange act of 1934, any national or international organization of commodities or securities officials or agencies, and any governmental law enforcement agency.

(2) The cooperation authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Making joint examinations or investigations;

(b) Holding joint administrative hearings;

(c) Filing and prosecuting joint litigation;

(d) Sharing and exchanging information and documents;

(e) Formulating and adopting mutual regulations, statements of policy, guidelines, proposed statutory changes and releases; and

(f) Issuing and enforcing subpoenas at the request of the agency administering similar statutes in another jurisdiction, the securities agency of another jurisdiction, the commodity futures trading commission or the federal securities and exchange commission if the information sought would also be subject to lawful subpoena for conduct occurring in this state.

[ 1986 c 14 s 19.]